verbo/espanol_verbo_imperativo_afirmativa.foma
define ImperAfirTu1 [a r "^""^"] -> a || _ 2;
define ImperAfirElla1 [a r "^""^"] -> e || _ 3;
define ImperAfirNos1 [a r "^""^"] -> {emos} || _ 4;
define ImperAfirVos1 [a r "^""^"] -> {ad} || _ 5;
define ImperAfirUst1 [a r "^""^"] -> {en} || _ 6;

define ImperAfirTu2 [e r "^""^"] -> e || _ 2;
define ImperAfirElla2 [e r "^""^"] -> a || _ 3;
define ImperAfirNos2 [e r "^""^"] -> {amos} || _ 4;
define ImperAfirVos2 [e r "^""^"] -> {ed} || _ 5;
define ImperAfirUst2 [e r "^""^"] -> {an} || _ 6;

define ImperAfirTu3 [i r "^""^"] -> e || _ 2;
define ImperAfirElla3 [i r "^""^"] -> a || _ 3;
define ImperAfirNos3 [i r "^""^"] -> {amos} || _ 4;
define ImperAfirVos3 [i r "^""^"] -> {id} || _ 5;
define ImperAfirUst3 [i r "^""^"] -> {an} || _ 6;

define ImperAfir1 ImperAfirTu1 .o. ImperAfirElla1 .o. ImperAfirNos1 .o. ImperAfirVos1 .o. ImperAfirUst1;
define ImperAfir2 ImperAfirTu2 .o. ImperAfirElla2 .o. ImperAfirNos2 .o. ImperAfirVos2 .o. ImperAfirUst2;
define ImperAfir3 ImperAfirTu3 .o. ImperAfirElla3 .o. ImperAfirNos3 .o. ImperAfirVos3 .o. ImperAfirUst3;

define ImperAfir ImperAfir1 .o. ImperAfir2 .o. ImperAfir3;
